Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
466 [OLD]

PUBLIC
ACCOUNTANCY

REPEALED. L 1973, c 158, §1.

CHAPTER
466

PUBLIC
ACCOUNTANCY

Part I. General Provisions

Section

466-1 Purpose

466-2 Short title

466-3 Definitions

466-4 Board of public accountancy

466-5 License of certified public accountant

466-5.5 Educational requirements for licensure
effective

December 31, 2000

466-6 License of public accountant

466-7 Permits to practice

466-8 Fees

466-9 Disciplinary action

466-10 Prohibited acts

466-11 Injunctions against prohibited acts

466-11.5 Single act evidence of practice

466-12 Ownership of accountant's working papers

466-13, 14 Repealed

466-15 Advisory committees

466-17 Construction; severability

Part II. Peer Review Process

466-31 Definitions

466-32 Establishment of peer review process;

confidentiality

466-33 Standards for peer reviews and sponsoring

organizations

466-34 Enrollment and participation

466-35 Peer review compliance reporting form

466-36 Hawaii supplement to the peer review
report

466-37 Retention of documents

466-38 Reporting to the board

466-39 Appeals

466-40 Procedures for sponsoring organization

466-41 Oversight of sponsoring organizations

466-42 Peer review oversight committee

466-43 Oversight of peer reviewers for a Hawaii

supplemental peer review

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next